Massachusetts, session 194th, H2814.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 3 (g) of Chapter 32 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2016
Official
Edition is hereby amended by inserting after the word "powers":-
“special investigators of the alcoholic beverages control commission."
of 1